apertium-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="Marka__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Osen__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Midhavet__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Norge__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Ås__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r></p><par n="'_case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Store__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="attr"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>-</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="attr"/><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Odd ones: -->
<pardef n="Jesu/s__np">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="np"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>s<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Krist/us__np">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>         <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>          <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>





    <!-- Interjections -->

<pardef n="ak__ij">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>





    <!-- Pronouns -->


  <!-- prpers with det.pos: -->
  <pardef n="det+prn_pos">
<e>         <p><l></l>  <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
<e>         <p><l></l>  <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

<pardef n="/jeg__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>mig</l>  <r>jeg<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jeg</l>  <r>jeg<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>min</l>  <r>min</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mine</l> <r>min</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mit</l>  <r>min</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/u__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>  <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>   <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>  <r>in</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ine</l> <r>in</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>  <r>in</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="h/an__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>  <r>an<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>  <r>an<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ans</l> <r>ans</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ans</l> <r>ans</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ans</l> <r>ans</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="h/un__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>un<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>un<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>endes</l>     <r>endes</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>endes</l>     <r>endes</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>endes</l>     <r>endes</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="de/n__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>  <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>  <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>  <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>  <r>n<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l> <r>ns</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l> <r>ns</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l> <r>ns</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l> <r>ts</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l> <r>ts</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l> <r>ts</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/vi__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>vi</l>      <r>vi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>      <r>vi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vores</l>   <r>vores</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vores</l>   <r>vores</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vores</l>   <r>vores</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/I__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>I</l>       <r>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jer</l>     <r>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jeres</l>   <r>jeres</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jeres</l>   <r>jeres</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jeres</l>   <r>jeres</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="de__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>m</l>     <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>res</l>   <r>res</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>res</l>   <r>res</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>res</l>   <r>res</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="De__prn" c="TODO: upper/lower-case lemma won't distinguish this">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>m</l>     <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>res</l>   <r>res</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>res</l>   <r>res</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>res</l>   <r>res</r></p><par n="det+prn_pos"/><p><l></l><r><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bom">             <i>bom</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
<e lm="vov">          <i>vov</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
<e lm="ja">              <i>ja</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
<e lm="næh">             <i>næh</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
<e lm="øv">              <i>øv</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
<e lm="dav" a="PT">      <i>dav</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
<e lm="god aften">  <p><l>god<b/>aften</l>  <r>godaften</r></p><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
<e lm="held og lykke" a="PT"><i>held<b/>og<b/>lykke</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
<e lm="jeg">             <par n="/jeg__prn"/></e>
<e lm="du">              <i>d</i><par n="d/u__prn"/></e>
<e lm="hun">             <i>h</i><par n="h/un__prn"/></e>
<e lm="han">             <i>h</i><par n="h/an__prn"/></e>
<e lm="den">             <i>de</i><par n="de/n__prn"/></e>
<e lm="vi">              <par n="/vi__prn"/></e>
<e lm="I">               <par n="/I__prn"/></e>
<e lm="de">              <i>de</i><par n="de__prn"/></e>
<e lm="Auschwitz">       <i>Auschwitz</i><par n="Ås__np"/></e>
<e lm="Damaskus">        <i>Damaskus</i><par n="Ås__np"/></e>
<e lm="Goiás"> <i>Goiás</i><par n="Ås__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kaunas">          <i>Kaunas</i><par n="Ås__np"/></e>
<e lm="Los">             <i>Los</i><par n="Ås__np"/></e>
<e lm="Oras"> <i>Oras</i><par n="Ås__np"/></e>
<e lm="Roos"> <i>Roos</i><par n="Ås__np"/></e>
<e lm="Svenes"> <i>Svenes</i><par n="Ås__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jesus">           <i>Jesu</i><par n="Jesu/s__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kristus">         <i>Krist</i><par n="Krist/us__np"/></e>
<e lm="Karibhavet">      <i>Karibhavet</i><par n="Midhavet__np"/></e>
<e lm="Magellanstrædet"> <i>Magellanstrædet</i><par n="Midhavet__np"/></e>
<e lm="Adriahavet">      <i>Adriahavet</i><par n="Midhavet__np"/></e>
<e lm="Beringstrædet">   <i>Beringstrædet</i><par n="Midhavet__np"/></e>
<e lm="Grønlandshavet">  <i>Grønlandshavet</i><par n="Midhavet__np"/></e>
<e lm="Japanhavet">      <i>Japanhavet</i><par n="Midhavet__np"/></e>
<e lm="Skedsmokorset">   <i>Skedsmokorset</i><par n="Midhavet__np"/></e>
<e lm="Vassfaret">       <i>Vassfaret</i><par n="Midhavet__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sunndalsøra">     <i>Sunndalsøra</i><par n="Marka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Rodeløkka">       <i>Rodeløkka</i><par n="Marka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hustadvika">      <i>Hustadvika</i><par n="Marka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Grünerløkka">     <i>Grünerløkka</i><par n="Marka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dramselven">       <i>Dramselven</i><par n="Osen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Buvika">          <i>Buvika</i><par n="Marka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bekkestua">       <i>Bekkestua</i><par n="Marka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Arvika">          <i>Arvika</i><par n="Marka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nesøen">          <i>Nesøen</i><par n="Osen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kyrksæterøra">    <i>Kyrksæterøra</i><par n="Marka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Atacamaørkenen">  <i>Atacamaørkenen</i><par n="Osen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hardangerjøkulen"><i>Hardangerjøkulen</i><par n="Osen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sydpolen">        <i>Sydpolen</i><par n="Osen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Knivskjellodden"> <i>Knivskjellodden</i><par n="Osen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bærumsbanen">     <i>Bærumsbanen</i><par n="Osen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Haltenbanken">    <i>Haltenbanken</i><par n="Osen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Romsdalen">       <i>Romsdalen</i><par n="Osen__np"/></e>
<e lm="Beneluxlandene"><i>Beneluxlandene</i><par n="Norge__np"/></e>
<e lm="Chi"><i>Chi</i><par n="Norge__np"/></e>
<e lm="Great"><i>Great</i><par n="Store__np"/></e>
<e lm="Guptariget"><i>Guptariget</i><par n="Norge__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kejserriget Japan"><i>Kejserriget<b/>Japan</i><par n="Norge__np"/></e>
<e lm="Masterud"><i>Masterud</i><par n="Norge__np"/></e>
<e lm="Novaja"><i>Novaja</i><par n="Store__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ravndal"><i>Ravndal</i><par n="Norge__np"/></e>
<e lm="Stryn"><i>Stryn</i><par n="Norge__np"/></e>
<e lm="Vuolle"><i>Vuolle</i><par n="Norge__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dronning"> <i>Dronning</i><par n="Store__np"/></e>
<e lm="Årøya">                   <i>Årøya</i><par n="Marka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eiffeltårnet">            <i>Eiffeltårnet</i><par n="Midhavet__np"/></e>
<e lm="Man">                <i>Man</i><par n="Store__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cape">               <i>Cape</i><par n="Store__np"/></e>
<e lm="International">      <i>International</i><par n="Store__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kaptein">            <i>Kaptein</i><par n="Store__np"/></e>
<e lm="Company">            <i>Company</i><par n="Store__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pamfylias">          <i>Pamfylias</i><par n="Ås__np"/></e>
